District of Columbia statutes.
28-3107

Remedies of creditors.

(a)

In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this chapter, a creditor, subject to the limitations in section 28-3108, may obtain:

(1)

Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim;

(2)

An attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee in accordance with the procedure prescribed by sections 16-501 through 16-584;

(3)

Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure:

(A)

An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

(B)

Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of other property of the transferee; or

(C)

Any other relief the circumstances may require.

(b)

If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor, if the court so orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-83, § 2, 42 DCR 6773
This section is referenced in § 28-3108.
1981 Ed., § 28-3107.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act.